Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Article 4. Employee Benefits

Compensation not barred because of work continuation. —

A worker cannot be barred from compensation for an injury incurred in his employment because he continued to work. In re Van Buskirk, 741 P.2d 120,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 494

(Wyo. 1987).

Nor because employee receives former wages. —

The mere fact that after the injury the employee receives, or is offered, his former wages, or a larger sum, does not necessarily preclude recovery of worker's compensation. In re Van Buskirk, 741 P.2d 120,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 494

(Wyo. 1987).

Cited

in

Tenorio v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Comp. Div., 931 P.2d 234,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

82 Am. Jur. 2d Workmen's Compensation §§ 379 to 445.

Workers' compensation: vocational rehabilitation statutes, 67 ALR4th 612.

Workers' compensation: recovery for home service provided by spouse, 67 ALR4th 765.

99 C.J.S. Workmen's Compensation §§ 266 to 295.

§ 27-14-401.
Medical, hospital and ambulance expenses; review of claim; employer and division designated providers; contracts for bill review, case management and related programs; air ambulance reimbursement.

The expense of medical and hospital care of an injured employee shall be paid from the date of the compensable injury unless under general arrangement the employee is entitled to free medical and hospital care or the employer furnishes adequate and proper medical and hospital care to his employees.

No fee for medical or hospital care under this section shall be allowed by the division without first reviewing the fee for appropriateness and reasonableness in accordance with its adopted fee schedules.

Hospital care includes private nursing or nursing home care if approved by the director.

Medical and hospital care shall be obtained if possible within Wyoming, or in an adjoining state if the hospital or health care provider in the adjoining state is closer to the scene of the accident or to the usual place of employment of the employee than a hospital or health care provider in Wyoming, unless otherwise authorized by the division. Except as otherwise authorized by the division, reimbursements for travel in obtaining medical and hospital care shall not be paid:

For travel of less than ten (10) miles one (1) way except by ambulance travel as set forth in W.S. 27-14-401(e);

For travel other than that necessary to obtain the closest available medical or hospital care needed by the employee except in those instances where travel within Wyoming is at a greater distance than travel outside of Wyoming;

In excess of the rates at which state employees are paid per diem and mileage.

If transportation by ambulance is necessary, the division shall allow a reasonable charge for the ambulance service at a rate not in excess of the rate schedule established by the director under the procedure set forth for payment of medical and hospital care, provided this subsection shall not apply to air ambulance transport services.

Subject to subsection (h) of this section, an employer or the division may designate health care providers to provide nonemergency medical attention to his employees or to claimants under this act. Except as provided in subsection (h) of this section, the employee may for any reason, select any other health care provider. If the employee selects a health care provider other than the one (1) selected by the employer or the division, the employer or division may require a second opinion from a health care provider of their choice. The second opinion may include an independent medical evaluation, a functional capacity exam or a review of the diagnosis, prognosis, treatment and fees of the employee’s health care provider. The independent medical evaluation, a functional capacity exam or the review by the employer’s health care provider shall be paid for by the employer and the evaluation, a functional capacity exam or review by the division’s health care provider shall be paid from the worker’s compensation account.

The division may engage in and contract for medical bill review programs, medical case management programs and utilization review programs. The division may also negotiate with out-of-state health care providers regarding the payment of fees for necessary medical care to injured workers, not to exceed the usual, customary charges for the comparable treatment in the community where rendered or the amount payable for the same services by the worker’s compensation fund or account of the state where rendered, whichever is less.

In the case of an inmate employed in a correctional industries program authorized by W.S.

25-13-101

through

25-13-107

or performing services pursuant to W.S.

7-16-202

, the department of corrections shall select the health care provider for the inmate.

Emergency and medically necessary air ambulance transport services for an employee shall be covered under W.S.

42-4-123

, subject to availability and any limitations specified by the department under W.S.

42-4-123

(a). The department of workforce services shall pay reimbursement for services under this section to the department of health as specified under W.S. 42-4-123. Application of this subsection shall be contingent on operation of the air ambulance transport services program under W.S. 42-4-123(b).

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1989, ch. 264, § 2; 1991, ch. 133, § 1; 1993, ch. 157, § 1; 1997, ch. 177, § 1; 1998, ch. 117, § 1; 1999, ch. 141, § 2; ch. 150, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2019 ch. 189, § 3, effective April 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 22, § 2, effective March 9, 2020.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, inserted “or account” in (g).

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 1, 2020, in (e), added “provided this subsection shall not apply to air ambulance transport services” at the end; and added (j).

The 2020 amendment,

in (j), added the last sentence.

Laws 2020, ch. 22, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2020.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.

Applicability.—

Laws 2019, ch. 189 § 6, provides: "This act applies to air ambulance transport services provided on or after April 1, 2020."

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Worker's compensation act considered continuing appropriation. —

Because the Wyoming Worker’s Compensation Act is considered a continuing appropriation and the payment of claims under the Act requires no further action under the appropriation provision of the constitution, and because the Act, with the workers’ compensation ambulance provision severed from it, authorizes the payment of the claimants’ air ambulance charges in full, the severed statute is now part of the Act’s continuing appropriation, and the Office of Administrative Hearings did not order a payment without appropriation. Air Methods v. Dep't of Workforce Servs., 2018 WY 128, 432 P.3d 476,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 2018).

Compensation for unauthorized medical treatment denied.—

Worker’s compensation claimant was not entitled to benefits when the claimant underwent a surgical procedure to treat a work-related back injury that had not been approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration and was not an off-label use of medical services. Furthermore, the claimant failed to provide sufficient documentation of the procedure’s safety and effectiveness, thus rendering it alternative medicine for which benefits were denied. Harborth v. State ex rel. Dep't of Workforce Servs., 2018 WY 99, 424 P.3d 1261,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 2018).

Federal preemption. —

District court
did not err when it found that Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

27-14-401

and a rate schedule the Workers' Compensation Division
of the Wyoming Department of Workforce Services developed for paying
companies that provided air-ambulance services to workers who were
covered under Wyoming's Worker's Compensation Act were preempted by
the Airline Deregulation Act, 49 U.S.C.S. § 41713, because they regulated prices charged by air carriers
that provided air transportation services; however, the district court
exceeded its authority when it ordered officials at the Wyoming Department
of Workforce Services to pay the full amount companies charged for
air-ambulance services, whatever that amount might be. Eaglemed LLC v. Cox, 868 F.3d 893,

2017 U.S. App. LEXIS 15962

(10th Cir. Wyo. 2017).

District court did not err when it found that Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

27-14-401

and a rate schedule the Workers’ Compensation Division of the Wyoming Department of Workforce Services developed for paying companies that provided air-ambulance services to workers who were covered under Wyoming’s Worker’s Compensation Act were preempted by the Airline Deregulation Act, 49 U.S.C.S. § 41713, because they regulated prices charged by air carriers that provided air transportation services; however, the district court exceeded its authority when it ordered officials at the Wyoming Department of Workforce Services to pay the full amount companies charged for air-ambulance services, whatever that amount might be. Eaglemed LLC v. Cox, 868 F.3d 893,

2017 U.S. App. LEXIS 15962

(10th Cir. Wyo. 2017).

In a case in which the Wyoming Workers’ Compensation Division paid the claimants, who operated air ambulance services in Wyoming, only the amounts permitted by its fee schedule, the Division was required to pay the full amount billed by the claimants because severing the workers’ compensation ambulance provision was consistent with the Wyoming Worker’s Compensation Act’s goal of quick and efficient delivery of medical benefits; as severed, air ambulance charges incurred by an injured worker were covered expenses, and the Division had authority to pay those charges; and, applying the Airline Deregulation Act of 1978 (ADA), the Division was barred by the ADA’s preemption provision from taking unilateral action to reduce the claimants’ rates. Air Methods v. Dep't of Workforce Servs., 2018 WY 128, 432 P.3d 476,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 2018).

Relation of charges to workplace injury. —

Office of Administrative Hearings properly denied the claimant's claim for payment for a left knee arthroscopy that he claimed was related to his workplace injury because substantial evidence supported the conclusion that there was no causal connection between the claimant's 1993 workplace injury and his 2009 left knee pain as the medical evidence could not be stretched to support the claimant's assertion that he received “continuous” treatment for his left knee Trump v. State, 2013 WY 140, 312 P.3d 802,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 2013).

Second compensable injury rule is alive and well. —

Casper Oil Co. v. Evenson, 888 P.2d 221,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1995).

Relation of charges to workplace injury. —

Division was not estopped from denying benefits based on its issuance of decision stating that claimant's injury was compensable, since that decision was distinct from division's authority to analyze each charge submitted by claimant to determine whether such change was causally related to workplace injury. Armstrong v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 991 P.2d 140,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 1999).

Award for physician's bill and hospital charges not disposition of case on merits. —

Where district court made orders of award in payment of physician's bill and hospitalization charges in action under Workmen's Compensation Law (now Worker's Compensation Act), this was not a disposition of the case on its merits so as to justify an award for compensation. In re Corey, 65 Wyo. 301, 200 P.2d 333,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1948).

Services rendered by nonresident surgeons

should be duly authorized by Wyoming courts upon good reasons advanced before claimants should be permitted, without limitation, to employ professional medical service beyond the borders of this state. Such matters should not be left to the claimant himself to determine and to thereby fasten a liability upon the Workmen's (now Worker's) Compensation fund of this state. Ludlow v. Wortham Mach. Co., 71 Wyo. 331, 257 P.2d 358,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1953).

Notice to employer of change in physician not required. —

While subsection (b) requires notice to an employer with an opportunity for hearing before a claim is allowed for payment, it does not require notice to the employer of a change in attending physician with an opportunity to object thereto. Dyna-Drill v. Wallingford, 605 P.2d 1301,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 233

(Wyo. 1980).

Closest available medical or hospital care. —

Conclusion by Office of Administrative Hearings that an Idaho Falls doctor was the closest available provider for a workers'
compensation claimant, an Idaho resident, was supported by substantial evidence and not arbitrary and capricious; conclusion only meant that the claimant was not entitled to reimbursement of travel expenses incurred to obtain treatment from the physician who was not the closest available provider.
Dorman v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2012 WY 94, 281 P.3d 342,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 2012).

Where a claimant argued that Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

27-14-401

required the hearing examiner to reimburse him for the portion of his Utah travel expenses that he would have paid if he had instead gone to Rock Springs, Wyoming for treatment, the statute expresses a preference that medical care be obtained in Wyoming and/or at an appropriate facility closest to an employee's home, and the claimant's interpretation would read the expressed preference and its corollary effect on travel reimbursement out of the statute. Birch v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2014 WY 31, 319 P.3d 901,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 2014).

Home health care. —

A workers' compensation hearing examiner was without authority to award nonprofessional home health care to an injured worker in the absence of a mutual agreement between the employee, employer, and director of the workers' compensation division. (decision under prior law); State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Comp. Div. v. Jacobs, 924 P.2d 982,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1996).

Inmate employed in a correctional industries program. —

Under § 25-13-106(a) and subsection (h) of this section, inmates working in the correctional industries program, which includes the prison laundry, are covered by worker's compensation. In re Worker's Comp. Claim v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2002 WY 37, 42 P.3d 461,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 2002).

Quoted

in

State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Comp. Div. v. Girardot, 807 P.2d 926,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1991); Serda v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2002 WY 38, 42 P.3d 466,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 2002); Beall v. Sky Blue Enters. (in re Beall), 2012 WY 38, 271 P.3d 1022,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Mar. 14, 2012).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div. v. Malkowski, 741 P.2d 604,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 499

(Wyo. 1987); State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. v. Jackson, 994 P.2d 320,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 193

(Wyo. 1999); Porter v. State ex rel. Dep't of Workforce Servs. (In re Worker's Comp. Claim), 2017 WY 69, 396 P.3d 999,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 2017).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Workers' compensation: value of home services provided by victim's relative, 65 ALR4th 142.

Workers' compensation: compensability of injuries incurred traveling to or from medical treatment of earlier compensable injury, 83 ALR4th 110.

Compensability of specially equipped van or vehicle under workers' compensation statutes, 63 ALR5th 163.

§ 27-14-402.
Payment for artificial replacement.

In addition to payment of medical and hospital care provided by this act, an injured employee may receive payment for essential and adequate artificial replacement of any part of the body which is amputated. If the injury requires artificial replacement an injured employee may receive payment for any adequate and essential artificial aid to hearing or sight, a spinal brace or other similar brace or for artificial dental replacement. Payment for artificial dental replacement shall be in accordance with the schedule adopted by the division.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3.

Calculation based on monthly income. —

Where employee's income varied substantially from month to month the hearing examiner properly averaged employee's income to determine employee's temporary total disability benefits and excluded gratuities that were not reported to the government. However, where employee had worked three and one half months the examiner improperly divided the total income by four months. Goe v. State ex rel. Wyo. Worker's Comp. Div., 2002 WY 6, 38 P.3d 1063, Wyo. LEXIS 6 (Wyo. 2002).

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Workers' compensation as covering cost of penile or similar implants related to sexual or reproductive activity, 89 ALR4th 1057.